District of Columbia statutes.
1-207.18

Continuation of District of Columbia court system.

(a)

The District of Columbia Court of Appeals, the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, and the District of Columbia Commission on Judicial Disabilities and Tenure shall continue as provided under the District of Columbia Court Reorganization Act of 1970 subject to the provisions of part C of subchapter IV of this chapter and § 1-206.02(a)(4).

(b)

The term and qualifications of any judge of any District of Columbia court, and the term and qualifications of any member of the District of Columbia Commission on Judicial Disabilities and Tenure appointed prior to the effective date of subchapter IV of this chapter shall not be affected by the provisions of part C of subchapter IV of this chapter. No provision of this chapter shall be construed to extend the term of any such judge or member of such Commission. Judges of the District of Columbia courts and members of the District of Columbia Commission on Judicial Disabilities and Tenure appointed after the effective date of subchapter IV of this chapter shall be appointed according to part C of such subchapter IV.

(c)

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to amend, repeal, or diminish the duties, rights, privileges, or benefits accruing under §§ 11-1561 through 11-1571 and §§ 11-703 and 11-904, dealing with the retirement and compensation of the judges of the District of Columbia courts.

History

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 820, Pub. L. 93-198, title VII, § 718

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-207.71.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., Title 11, appx., § 718.
1973 Ed., Title 11, appx., § 718.